src/morphology/stems/acronyms.lexc
LEXICON mtprotocolend
    %:   user ;

LEXICON userdomain
    user ;
    domain ;

LEXICON user
    < [ a | b | c | d | e | f | g | h | i | j | k
      | l | m | n | o | p | q | r | s | t | u | v
      | w | x | y | z | A | B | C | D | E | F | G
      | H | I | J | K | L | M | N | O | P | Q | R
      | S | T | U | V | W | X | Y | Z |%. |%:
      |%- |%_
      |%0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9 ]^>1 > userend;

LEXICON userend
 %@ domain ; ! @ - to reset syntax colouring

LEXICON domain
 predomain  ;
 realdomain ;

LEXICON predomain
    < [ a | b | c | d | e | f | g | h | i | j | k
      | l | m | n | o | p | q | r | s | t | u | v
      | w | x | y | z | A | B | C | D | E | F | G
      | H | I | J | K | L | M | N | O | P | Q | R
      | S | T | U | V | W | X | Y | Z |%. |%:
      |%- |%_
      |%0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9 ]+ > realdomain ;

! We require that the domain name must be at least two letters or numbers -
! no full stop or other delimiter as the last two characters of the
! domain name. This will prevent strings like "Innst.O.nr" to be parsed
! as URL's.
LEXICON realdomain
    < [ a | b | c | d | e | f | g | h | i | j | k
      | l | m | n | o | p | q | r | s | t | u | v
      | w | x | y | z | A | B | C | D | E | F | G
      | H | I | J | K | L | M | N | O | P | Q | R
      | S | T | U | V | W | X | Y | Z
      |%0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9 ]^>1 > topdomain ;

LEXICON topdomain
 %. topdomainlist ;

LEXICON enddomain
 %/ path   ;
! %/ endlex ; !må skabe en løkke, eller i hvert fald overflødig, idet LEXICON path også sender WF til endlex
    endlex ;

LEXICON path
    endlex      ;
    pathcontent ;

LEXICON pathcontent
    < [ a | b | c | d | e | f | g | h | i | j | k
      | l | m | n | o | p | q | r | s | t | u | v
      | w | x | y | z | A | B | C | D | E | F | G
      | H | I | J | K | L | M | N | O | P | Q | R
      | S | T | U | V | W | X | Y | Z |%. |%/ |%~
      |%0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9
      |%- |%_ |%? |%& |%= |%% |%# |%@ ]+ > pathcontentend ;

! @ - to reset syntax colouring

LEXICON pathcontentend
    < [ a | b | c | d | e | f | g | h | i | j | k
      | l | m | n | o | p | q | r | s | t | u | v
      | w | x | y | z | A | B | C | D | E | F | G
      | H | I | J | K | L | M | N | O | P | Q | R
      | S | T | U | V | W | X | Y | Z |%/ |%_ |%#
      |%0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9 ]^>1 > endlex ;

LEXICON endlex
! < "+Sem/Url":0 > # ;
 +Sem/Url:	PropZ1Zmorf ;
 +Sem/Url:-	PropZ1Zmorf ;
 +Sem/Url:%-	PropZ1Zmorf ;
 

LEXICON topdomainlist
 net                enddomain ;
 edu                enddomain ;
 mil                enddomain ;
 ac                 enddomain ;
 ae                 enddomain ;
 ag                 enddomain ;
 al                 enddomain ;
 an                 enddomain ;
 aq                 enddomain ;
 as                 enddomain ;
 au                 enddomain ;
 ax                 enddomain ;
 ba                 enddomain ;
 bd                 enddomain ;
 bf                 enddomain ;
 bh                 enddomain ;
 bj                 enddomain ;
 bm                 enddomain ;
 bo                 enddomain ;
 br                 enddomain ;
 bt                 enddomain ;
 bw                 enddomain ;
 bz                 enddomain ;
 cc                 enddomain ;
 cf                 enddomain ;
 ch                 enddomain ;
 ck                 enddomain ;
 cm                 enddomain ;
 co                 enddomain ;
 cu                 enddomain ;
 cw                 enddomain ;
 cy                 enddomain ;
 de                 enddomain ;
 dk                 enddomain ;
 do                 enddomain ;
 ec                 enddomain ;
 eg                 enddomain ;
 er                 enddomain ;
 et                 enddomain ;
 fi                 enddomain ;
 fk                 enddomain ;
 fo                 enddomain ;
 ga                 enddomain ;
 gd                 enddomain ;
 gf                 enddomain ;
 gh                 enddomain ;
 gl                 enddomain ;
 gn                 enddomain ;
 gq                 enddomain ;
 gs                 enddomain ;
 gu                 enddomain ;
 gy                 enddomain ;
 hm                 enddomain ;
 hr                 enddomain ;
 hu                 enddomain ;
 ie                 enddomain ;
 im                 enddomain ;
 io                 enddomain ;
 ir                 enddomain ;
 it                 enddomain ;
 jm                 enddomain ;
 jp                 enddomain ;
 kg                 enddomain ;
 ki                 enddomain ;
 kn                 enddomain ;
 kr                 enddomain ;
 ky                 enddomain ;
 la                 enddomain ;
 lc                 enddomain ;
 lk                 enddomain ;
 ls                 enddomain ;
 lu                 enddomain ;
 ly                 enddomain ;
 mc                 enddomain ;
 me                 enddomain ;
 mg                 enddomain ;
 mk                 enddomain ;
 mm                 enddomain ;
 mo                 enddomain ;
 mq                 enddomain ;
 ms                 enddomain ;
 mu                 enddomain ;
 mw                 enddomain ;
 my                 enddomain ;
 na                 enddomain ;
 ne                 enddomain ;
 ng                 enddomain ;
 nl                 enddomain ;
 np                 enddomain ;
 nu                 enddomain ;
 om                 enddomain ;
 pe                 enddomain ;
 pg                 enddomain ;
 pk                 enddomain ;
 pm                 enddomain ;
 pr                 enddomain ;
 pt                 enddomain ;
 py                 enddomain ;
 re                 enddomain ;
 rs                 enddomain ;
 rw                 enddomain ;
 sb                 enddomain ;
 sd                 enddomain ;
 sg                 enddomain ;
 si                 enddomain ;
 sk                 enddomain ;
 sm                 enddomain ;
 so                 enddomain ;
 ss                 enddomain ;
 su                 enddomain ;
 sz                 enddomain ;
 tg                 enddomain ;
 tl                 enddomain ;
 tp                 enddomain ;
 tw                 enddomain ;
 uk                 enddomain ;
 uz                 enddomain ;
 vg                 enddomain ;
 wf                 enddomain ;
 za                 enddomain ;
 academy            enddomain ;
 actor              enddomain ;
 agency             enddomain ;
 archi              enddomain ;
 attorney           enddomain ;
 author             enddomain ;
 baby               enddomain ;
 barefoot           enddomain ;
 beer               enddomain ;
 bid                enddomain ;
 biz                enddomain ;
 blog               enddomain ;
 book               enddomain ;
 broker             enddomain ;
 buy                enddomain ;
 call               enddomain ;
 cancerresearch     enddomain ;
 career             enddomain ;
 case               enddomain ;
 catholic           enddomain ;
 channel            enddomain ;
 church             enddomain ;
 cleaning           enddomain ;
 cloud              enddomain ;
 coffee             enddomain ;
 computer           enddomain ;
 contact            enddomain ;
 coop               enddomain ;
 courses            enddomain ;
 cruises            enddomain ;
 dating             enddomain ;
 degree             enddomain ;
 dentist            enddomain ;
 diamonds           enddomain ;
 directory          enddomain ;
 dog                enddomain ;
 earth              enddomain ;
 email              enddomain ;
 enterprises        enddomain ;
 estate             enddomain ;
 exposed            enddomain ;
 family             enddomain ;
 fashion            enddomain ;
 final              enddomain ;
 fish               enddomain ;
 flights            enddomain ;
 foo                enddomain ;
 forsale            enddomain ;
 frontdoor          enddomain ;
 futbol             enddomain ;
 games              enddomain ;
 gives              enddomain ;
 gold               enddomain ;
 gratis             enddomain ;
 guide              enddomain ;
 hangout            enddomain ;
 help               enddomain ;
 hockey             enddomain ;
 homes              enddomain ;
 host               enddomain ;
 house              enddomain ;
 immobilien         enddomain ;
 ink                enddomain ;
 international      enddomain ;
 jobs               enddomain ;
 kim                enddomain ;
 latino             enddomain ;
 legal              enddomain ;
 lighting           enddomain ;
 link               enddomain ;
 loans              enddomain ;
 love               enddomain ;
 luxury             enddomain ;
 market             enddomain ;
 media              enddomain ;
 men                enddomain ;
 mobily             enddomain ;
 mortgage           enddomain ;
 museum             enddomain ;
 new                enddomain ;
 now                enddomain ;
 onl                enddomain ;
 organic            enddomain ;
 parts              enddomain ;
 pet                enddomain ;
 photos             enddomain ;
 pid                enddomain ;
 place              enddomain ;
 porn               enddomain ;
 pro                enddomain ;
 properties         enddomain ;
 qpon               enddomain ;
 realestate         enddomain ;
 red                enddomain ;
 reit               enddomain ;
 repair             enddomain ;
 restaurant         enddomain ;
 rip                enddomain ;
 rsvp               enddomain ;
 sarl               enddomain ;
 science            enddomain ;
 services           enddomain ;
 shoes              enddomain ;
 show               enddomain ;
 site               enddomain ;
 smile              enddomain ;
 solar              enddomain ;
 space              enddomain ;
 stream             enddomain ;
 sucks              enddomain ;
 surf               enddomain ;
 tattoo             enddomain ;
 tech               enddomain ;
 theater            enddomain ;
 tips               enddomain ;
 top                enddomain ;
 trade              enddomain ;
 travelersinsurance enddomain ;
 tushu              enddomain ;
 ventures           enddomain ;
 video              enddomain ;
 vision             enddomain ;
 voto               enddomain ;
 wanggou            enddomain ;
 webcam             enddomain ;
 weibo              enddomain ;
 wine               enddomain ;
 world              enddomain ;
 xxx                enddomain ;
 zero               enddomain ;
